Massachusetts, session 194th, H2308.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3A of chapter 40A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:-
(d) In the event that an MBTA community has reached the threshold required for it to be
consistent with local needs whereby low or moderate income housing exists in the MBTA
community in excess of 10 per cent of the housing units reported in the latest federal decennial
census of the city or town, as defined in section 20 of chapter 40B, such MBTA community shall
not be subject to this section.
of 1